Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.150

Denial, suspension, revocation of licenses, probationary orders—Authority.

The director is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license or issue conditional or probationary orders in the manner prescribed herein, in any case in which he or she finds that there has been a failure and/or refusal to comply with the requirements of this chapter, rules or regulations adopted hereunder.

[ 2011 c 336 s 574; 1959 c 139 s 15.]